sk_SK/rue_SK.dic
акробат/mo
анґлія/i
ареа/b
арзенал/n
астронавт/mo
атентатник/ms
бандітьскый/V
барка/c
Барма/l
батерія/i
бідак/ms
бісїдливость/k
біфтек/n
біціґель/g
блыха/d
бляха/d
бранджа/b
брунет/mo
брыловый/V
валибук/ms
варїха/d
вбити/CB
ведуча/l
верес/n
веснянка/c
відеоказета/b
вільха/d
вінкель/g
вірогодность/k
віцеґубернатор/mo
возвеличеный/V
впити/BC
втїха/d
вшалїти/AC
вшолавіти/AC
выбити/CB
выгыбкарь/m
выдобити/CB
выдрукованя/f
выпити/BC
выпряженый/V
выпуст/n
вырушыти/AC
высаджовати/AC
вытварник/ms
вышава/l
ґалванотерапія/i
гандель/g
ґастрітіда/b
ґелеточка/c
гіршость/k
ґлайха/d
глубочава/l
ґоніометрія/i
горор/n
грачкарь/m
гривна/b
гробарик/ms
ґуґель/g
гулянка/c
гурчаня/f
ґутаперча/l
Гуцул/mo
гый/V
депрівація/i
детектор/n
дзеленькати/AC
дзёбати/AC
ділетант/mo
дїтвак/ms
добити/CB
добірка/c
добовость/k
доцентура/b
дражба/l
драматік/ms
дрік/n
дротовый/V
думаня/h
дышель/g
евангелія/i
експрезідент/mo
енціклопедія/i
епоха/d
Ескімачка/c
єпіскопат/n
єрарха/d
жадатель/m
жалїти/AC
жалоба/l
жблюнкнути/AC
жеребность/k
жеруха/d
забити/CB
загыбель/g
заложак/ms
заморьскый/V
запалїня/f
запохыбовати/AC
заприсягати/AC
запха/d
запястя/h
засада/b
затока/c
збити/CB
здоровля/h
здоровя/h
здравя/h
здуднїти/AC
здырвити/AC
зима/l
зимованя/f
зоопарк/n
ідентічность/k
імперіаліста/m
імпертінентный/V
інвестор/mo
індустріалізація/i
йонометрія/i
кабіна/b
кавчук/n
кадровник/ms
калюга/j
камарат/mo
карга/j
каротка/c
кашель/g
кварник/ms
квартель/g
кіносала/b
кінчіня/f
кожушник/ms
кока/c
колїнковати/AC
колысати/AC
кольба/l
комбінація/i
комедіант/mo
кондіціонал/n
кооперація/i
коргель/m
корїнный/V
кость/k
коцодріст/mo
кочерьга/j
кревета/b
Кузмяк/ms
кулма/l
кухенька/c
лёха/d
листя/h
Літва/l
літерат/mo
лїяк/n
лыкоїд/mo
лыпинка/c
лябда/b
малёваня/f
манґель/g
маніак/ms
маніфестація/i
марга/j
мерзота/b
механік/ms
мікровага/j
Мікулашка/c
мімошкольскый/V
мініштрант/mo
містность/k
молга/j
моранґель/g
муха/d
мученик/ms
мысель/g
навезти/AC
навити/AC
надбити/CB
надвыроба/l
надзор/n
намага/j
намістя/h
намітованя/f
намноженый/V
напасть/k
напити/BC
напівколонія/i
наплакати/AC
наповідати/AC
натураліста/m
неборак/ms
невыгода/b
недопити/BC
нелюбый/V
ненависть/k
неточность/k
нитка/c
новозволеный/V
обезболёвати/AC
обескуражыти/AC
обити/CB
обіцяня/f
облюба/l
оглядник/ms
одводжіня/f
одказовати/AC
одкликнути/AC
одлюд/mo
одпити/BC
одссатый/V
окал/n
окрасти/AC
окроплёваня/f
окрутити/AC
олімпіада/b
ольха/d
опат/mo
опрощіня/f
ортодонція/i
осадка/c
осамітность/k
оспівованя/f
пайпа/l
пакель/g
палїня/f
пара/b
парха/d
пашерак/ms
педант/mo
пензель/g
перевага/j
передмістя/h
передпястя/h
передстойный/V
переоначіти/AC
перепашовлёвати/AC
перепити/BC
перечка/c
перспектіва/l
першокласник/ms
підбити/CB
підвага/j
підлость/k
підпруга/j
пікнік/n
піняжник/ms
пістація/i
планета/b
плутва/l
побити/CB
повага/j
поважовати/AC
повернути/AC
позачінати/AC
позбіговати/AC
покрайка/c
помога/j
поодрїзовати/AC
поожывлёвати/AC
попобити/CB
поправник/ms
порозжерати/AC
порозмінёвати/AC
поруха/d
поселїня/f
пособник/ms
потрава/l
потуга/j
прати/AC
предлога/j
прездравый/V
пресовати/AC
прецізность/k
припити/BC
припоминка/c
прислуга/j
проґноза/b
проґраматор/mo
проєкт/n
пропаґатор/mo
пропити/BC
прорывати/AC
просохнути/AC
просьба/l
противага/j
процесія/i
пуйдяк/ms
пукель/g
пунчоха/d
рапортованя/f
реалізатор/mo
рекація/i
реквізітарь/m
репетітор/mo
рештрукчный/V
рівновага/j
рівность/k
рїзачка/c
розвалина/b
ропуха/d
роспити/BC
росчарованя/f
рубель/g
рысак/n
самообслуга/j
самоук/ms
свердель/g
світобіжник/ms
святость/k
сейсмометрія/i
середина/b
сібілант/mo
сінекдоха/d
сінкопа/l
скаліченый/V
сконцентровати/AC
скрасти/AC
скуманя/f
славность/k
смуга/j
сонора/b
соровічка/c
спрага/j
спурность/k
стравник/ms
стрїха/d
субєтнос/n
сфарбленый/V
сычіня/f
сяга/j
темрява/l
тенґель/g
товарник/ms
тріґонометрія/i
убити/CB
україністка/c
улизаность/k
уніат/mo
успокоёваня/f
ученый/V
феновати/AC
фермент/n
фіґель/g
фіфлена/b
фразовати/AC
хмарник/ms
ховзаня/f
хустя/h
цумель/g
черемха/d
чіжма/l
чутка/c
шалїня/f
Шандор/m
Шевролет/n
шефредактор/mo
шніцель/g
штовханый/V
шуха/d
шындель/g
щастя/h
Щастя/h
щедрость/k
Японія/i
